Utah statutes.
3-1-4.   Purposes.
Such association may be organized for the purpose of engaging in any
cooperative activity for producers of agricultural products in connection
with:
(1)  producing, assembling, marketing, buying or selling agricultural
products, or harvesting, preserving, drying, processing, manufacturing,
blending, canning, packing, ginning, grading, storing, warehousing, handling,
shipping, or utilizing such products, or manufacturing or marketing the by-
products thereof;
(2)  seed and crop improvement, and soil conservation and rehabilitation;
(3)  manufacturing, buying or supplying to its members and others, machinery,
equipment, feed, fertilizer, coal, gasoline and other fuels, oils and other
lubricants, seeds, and all other agricultural and household supplies;
(4)  generating and distributing electrical energy and furnishing telephone
service to its members and others;
(5)  performing or furnishing business or educational services, on a co-
operative basis, for or to its members; or
(6)  financing any of the above enumerated activities.
